New York, session 2025-2026, A436.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 26 of section 265.00 of the penal law, as added 2 by chapter 130 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 3 26. "Rapid-fire modification device" means any bump stock, trigger 4 crank, binary trigger system, burst trigger system, pistol converter, or 5 any other device that is designed to accelerate the rate of fire of a 6 semi-automatic firearm, rifle or shotgun. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 8 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the penal law and the 9 general business law relating to pistol converters, as proposed in 10 legislative bills numbers S. 7365-B and A. 10053-A, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02675-01-5